Utah, session 2026, SB29.
Section 1. Section 63I-1-235 is amended to read:63I-1-235. Repeal dates: Title 35A.(1)Subsection 35A-1-202(2)(d), regarding the Child Care Advisory Committee, is repealed July 1, 20262029.(2)Section 35A-3-205, Creation of committee, is repealed July 1, 2026.(3)Subsection 35A-4-502(5), regarding the Employment Advisory Council, is repealed July 1, 2029.(4)Title 35A, Chapter 9, Part 6, Education Savings Incentive Program, is repealed July 1, 2028.(5)Section 35A-13-303, State Rehabilitation Advisory Council, is repealed July 1, 2034.(6)Section 35A-16-206, Utah Homeless Network Steering Committee, is repealed July 1, 2027.(7)Section 35A-16-207, Duties of the steering committee, is repealed July 1, 2027.(8)Section 35A-16-212, Property Loss Related to Homelessness Compensation Enterprise Fund, is repealed July 1, 2028.(9)Title 35A, Chapter 16, Part 10, Homeless Services Provider Ombudsman, is repealed July 1, 2030.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.